en: Duck liver
fr: Foie de canard

en: Whole foies gras from ducks, whole fat liver from ducks
de: Entenstopflebern am Stück, Ganze Entenstopflebern
fi: Kokonaiset ankan rasvamaksat
fr: Foies gras de canard entiers, Foie gras de canard entier
hr: Cijele foies gras od pataka
it: Foie gras di anatra intero

en: Whole cooked duck liver foie gras
fr: Foie gras de canard entier cuit

en: Whole frozen duck liver foie gras
fr: Foie gras de canard entier surgelé

en: Duck liver foie gras without pieces
fr: Bloc de foie gras de canard sans morceaux

en: Duck liver foie gras with 30% pieces
fr: Bloc de foie gras de canard avec 30% de morceaux

en: Duck liver foie gras with 50% pieces
fr: Bloc de foie gras de canard avec 50% de morceaux

en: Foies gras from gooses, fat liver from gooses
fi: Hanhenmaksapateet
fr: Foies gras d'oies, Foie gras d'oies
hr: Foies gras od gusaka
it: Foie gras di oca
nl: Ganzen foie gras

fr: Foies gras mi-cuits, foies gras mi-cuit, foie gras mi-cuit
nl: Halfgekookte foie gras

fr: Mousses de foie gras
nl: Foie gras moussen

en: Foies gras pâtés
fr: Pâtés de foie gras

en: Meat alternatives
fr: Alternatives à la viande
hr: Mesne alternative
nl: Vleesvervangers
pl: Alternatywy mięsa
zh: 肉类替代品, 肉類替代物

en: Meat analogues, Meat substitutes, Mock meats
ca: Substitutius de carn
de: Fleisch-Ersatzprodukte
es: Carnes vegetales, Sucedáneos de carne
fi: Lihankorvikkeet
fr: Substituts de viande
hr: Analozi mesa
hu: Húspótlók
it: Sostituti della carne
ja: 代替肉
nl: Vleeskopieën
pl: Zastępniki mięsa
ru: Мясозаменители
zh: 植物肉

en: Meat analogues from soy or wheat proteins
fr: Substituts de viande à partir de protéines de soja ou blé
hr: Mesni analozi iz proteina soje ili pšenice
pl: Zastępniki mięsa z białka sojowego lub pszennego, Alternatywy dla mięsa z białka sojowego lub pszennego

en: Meat analogues from pea proteins
fr: Substituts de viande à partir de protéines de pois
hr: Mesni analozi iz proteina graška
pl: Zastępniki mięsa z białka grochu, Alternatywy dla mięsa z białka grochu

en: Prepared meat cuts substitutes
fr: Substituts de charcuterie en tranches

en: Ham substitutes, Ham substituts, Plant-based ham prepacked
fr: Substituts du jambon blanc, Substituts du jambon, Spécialité végétale type jambon cuit préemballée
hr: Zamjene za šunku
pl: Zastępniki szynki, Alternatywy dla szynki

en: Salami substitutes, Vegan salami
da: Vegansk salami
sv: Vegansk salami

en: Foie gras substitutes
fr: Substituts du foie gras

en: Bacon substitutes, bacon substituts
fr: Substituts du bacon